Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB854.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1113-A. Conflicts of Interest.--A school board member shall abstain from all votes pertaining to a collective bargaining agreement if a spouse, romantic partner or household member of the school board member is in the bargaining unit covered by the collective bargaining agreement being voted on.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617